Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 190 Motor Vehicle Sales
190.058.
Motor Vehicle Commission — Membership — Powers — Duties.

The Motor Vehicle Commission is hereby created as an agency of the Commonwealth to carry out the functions and duties conferred upon it by this section.

The commission shall consist of twelve (12) members, eleven (11) of whom shall be appointed by the Governor, and the twelfth shall be the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation. The appointed members shall be:

One (1) representative of an automobile manufacturer;

One (1) representative of automobile wholesalers;

One (1) representative of consumers who shall have no direct financial interest in the industry;

Four (4) new motor vehicle dealers, but no more than two (2) shall represent the same automobile manufacturer as a franchise dealer; and

Four (4) used motor vehicle dealers.

In addition to the requirements of membership on the commission in subsection (2), the following requirements shall apply to the composition of the commission:

No more than seven (7) members shall be from the same political party; and

From the eight (8) members specified in subsection (2)(d) and (e), seven (7) shall be from separate Supreme Court districts.

Each member shall serve for a term of three (3) years. The staggered terms of membership dating from the gubernatorial appointments of July 15, 1982, shall remain in effect.

Members of the commission shall qualify by taking the constitutional oath of office which shall, with the certificate of appointment, be evidence of the authority of the member to act.

Each member of the commission shall be entitled to two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each day actually engaged in the duties of the office, including time spent in necessary travel to and from meetings and otherwise, together with all travel and other necessary expenses incurred while performing official duties.

The commission shall hold a regular annual meeting in September of each year and elect a chairman and vice chairman to serve for the ensuing year. The commission shall have regular meetings as the majority of the members specifies and special meetings at the request of any five (5) members. Reasonable notice of all meetings shall be given as commission administrative regulations prescribe.

A member of the commission shall not participate in the deliberations of the commission and shall not vote on any matter before the commission in which the member has a financial interest or is an interested party. A member shall voluntarily disqualify himself or herself from deliberating or voting upon matters that affect the member but shall not be required to disqualify from matters of general interest affecting the member, the member’s employer, or a business unit in which the member has a financial interest as a member of a class of persons to be affected by an administrative regulation or order of the commission.

A majority of the commissioners, excluding any disqualified commissioner, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business, for the performance of any duty, or for the exercise of any power of the commission. A vacancy in the commission, whether due to disqualification or otherwise, shall not impair the right of the remaining commissioners to exercise all the powers of the commission.

The commission shall employ an executive director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the commission. He shall maintain all minutes of the commission proceedings and shall be custodian of the files and records of the commission. The executive director shall employ the staff authorized by the commission. The commission may, by interagency contract, utilize assistance of any state agency.

The commission shall deposit all moneys received by it from license fees paid under this law with the State Treasurer, who shall keep them in a separate fund to be known as the “Motor Vehicle Commission Fund.” The commission may use this fund for salaries, wages, per diem, professional and consulting fees, grants, loans, contracts, travel expenses, equipment, office rent and expenses, and other necessary expenses incurred in carrying out its duties under this section as provided by legislative appropriation. Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, at the close of each biennium, the unexpended balance remaining in the motor vehicle commission fund shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next biennium.

The commission shall administer the provisions of this section, establish the qualifications of manufacturers and dealers, and ensure that the distribution and sale of new motor vehicles are conducted as provided in this chapter and under the commission’s administrative regulations.

The commission may issue orders and make determinations necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

190.010

to

190.080

. The orders shall set forth the findings on which the order is based, and the reason for the particular action taken. All orders shall be signed by the chairman or vice chairman and attested by the executive director.

The commission may hold hearings that shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. A member of the commission shall not participate in the deliberations of the commission and shall not vote on any matter if the member has been disqualified on any of the grounds under KRS

13B.040

.

The commission may cause legal proceedings to be instituted to enforce the provisions of this section and its administrative regulations, orders, and decisions. If it appears from any investigation of a possible violation of any other law or administrative regulation that a violation of the provisions of KRS

190.010

to

190.080

may have occurred, the matter shall be referred to the commission to determine whether proceedings under KRS

190.010

to

190.080

are appropriate. The commission may make contracts and execute instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its power or performance of its duties.

The availability of administrative procedures under this section shall not preclude the utilization of other remedies for violation of the provisions of this chapter which are available to the affected parties, including actions for injunctive relief.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 374, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 235, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 452, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 80, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 263, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2014, ch. 83, § 3, effective July 15, 2014.

190.059.
Appeal from final order of commission.

The final order of the commission granting or refusing to grant an application for a license, or to suspend or revoke a license may be appealed by an aggrieved party to the Circuit Court of Franklin County in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the court to grant such relief as the circumstances may require. If the issues involved were first presented to the commission by a complaint filed with the commission, the complainant may appeal from the decision of the commission in the same manner as prescribed above.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 374, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 318, § 81, effective July 15, 1996.

190.060.
Licensor to determine the place within state where trials or hearings are held — Other powers — Report of examiner — Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

190.061.
Motor vehicle dealers board — Members — Qualifications, terms — Meetings — Quorum. [Repealed.]

190.062.
Action for damages — Power of commission — Applicability of chapter and KRS Chapter 190A — Written demand for mediation required before civil action involving recreational vehicle franchise issues may be brought.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement or franchise, or the terms or provisions of any waiver, any person who is injured in his business or property by a violation of this section or any person so injured because he refuses to accede to a proposal for an arrangement which, if consummated, would be in violation of this section, may bring a civil action in the Franklin Circuit Court to enjoin further violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him, together with costs of the suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee.

The commission may order, deny, suspend, or revoke the license of any new motor vehicle dealer, new recreational vehicle dealer, manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative for failing to comply with any provisions of KRS

190.010

to

190.080

or KRS Chapter 190A, as such provisions apply, respectively, to new motor vehicle dealers, new recreational vehicle dealers, manufacturers, distributors, factory branches, or factory representatives; or in lieu thereof, or in addition thereto, may assess monetary penalties of a civil nature not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

The provisions of KRS

190.010

to

190.080

and KRS Chapter 190A, as such provisions apply, respectively, to new motor vehicle dealers, new recreational vehicle dealers, manufacturers, distributors, factor branches, or factory representatives, shall apply to all persons required to be licensed under the terms herein, and to dealerships and contracts between new motor vehicle dealers, new recreational vehicle dealers, and manufacturers, distributors, factory branches, or factory representatives at the time of its passage, and to all such future new motor vehicle dealerships and contracts.

In addition to the provisions of this section, before a civil action involving recreational vehicle franchise issues is brought, the party bringing suit for an alleged violation of this chapter shall serve a written demand for mediation on the offending party. The demand for mediation shall include a brief statement of the dispute and the relief sought by the party making the demand. The party making the demand shall serve the demand by certified mail to one (1) of the following addresses:

In an action between a new recreational vehicle dealer and a manufacturer, the address stated in the dealer agreement between the parties;

In an action between a new recreational vehicle dealer and a warrantor that is not a manufacturer, the address stated in any agreement between the parties; or

In an action between two (2) new recreational vehicle dealers, the address of the offending dealer in the records of the commission.

Within twenty (20) days after a demand for mediation is served under this subsection, the parties shall mutually select an independent mediator who is approved by the commission and meet with that mediator for the purpose of attempting to resolve the dispute at a location in this state selected by the mediator. The mediator may extend the date of the meeting for good cause shown by either party or if the parties agree to the extension.

The service of a demand for mediation under this subsection tolls the time for the filing of any complaint, petition, protest, or other action under this chapter until representatives of both parties have met with the mediator selected pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection for the purpose of attempting to resolve the dispute. If a complaint, petition, protest, or other action is filed before that meeting, the court shall enter an order suspending the proceeding or action until the mediation meeting has occurred and may, if all the parties to the proceeding or action stipulate in writing that they wish to continue to mediate under this subsection, enter an order suspending the proceeding or action for as long a period as the court considers appropriate.

Each of the parties to the mediation under this subsection is responsible for its own attorney fees. The parties shall equally divide the cost of the mediator.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 374, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2014, ch. 27, § 20, effective January 1, 2015.

190.063.
Records, public — Continuation of licenses.

All records of the commission, including those maintained by the department for its account, shall be public records. All persons holding any license which is authorized by this chapter, as of June 16, 1966, shall have the right to continue to hold, maintain, and renew such license after June 16, 1966, subject only to the suspension or revocation thereof pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 175, § 11; 1982, ch. 374, § 10, effective July 15, 1982.

190.067.
Department of Vehicle Regulation’s authority to perform commission’s duties upon failure or inability to perform.

If the commission fails to perform or is unable to perform any of its official duties within the time prescribed in this chapter, the department may perform these duties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 175, § 10; 1982, ch. 374, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 452, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 263, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

190.070.
Prohibited practices on the part of a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative.

It shall be a violation of this section for any manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative licensed under this chapter to require any new motor vehicle dealer in the Commonwealth:

To order or accept delivery of any motor vehicle, part or accessory thereof, appliances, equipment, or any other product not required by law, which shall not have been voluntarily ordered by the new motor vehicle dealer; except that this section is not intended to modify or supersede any terms or provisions of the franchise requiring new motor vehicle dealers to market a representative line of those motor vehicles which the manufacturer or distributor is publicly advertising.

To order or accept delivery of any new motor vehicle with special features, appliances, accessories, or equipment not included in the list price of the motor vehicle, as publicly advertised by the manufacturer or distributor.

To order for any person any parts, accessories, equipment, machinery tools, appliance, or any commodity whatsoever not required in connection with a recall campaign.

To participate monetarily in an advertising campaign or contest, any promotional materials, training materials, showroom or other display decorations, or materials, at the expense of the dealer, without the consent of the dealer.

To enter into any agreement with the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative, or to do any other act prejudicial to the new motor vehicle dealer by threatening to cancel a franchise or any contractual agreement existing between the dealer and the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative. Notice in good faith to any dealer of the dealer’s violation of any terms or provisions of the dealer’s franchise, or contractual agreement shall not constitute a violation of this law.

To change the capital structure of the dealership, or the means by or through which the dealer finances the operation of the dealership, provided that the dealership at all times meets any reasonable capital standards agreed to by the dealer, excluding any entity engaged primarily in providing financing or insurance on motor vehicles.

To refrain from participation in the management or investment in, or the acquisition of any other line of new motor vehicle or related products; provided, however, that this section does not apply unless the new motor vehicle dealer maintains a reasonable line of credit for each make or line of new motor vehicles, and that the new motor vehicle dealer remains in substantial compliance with the terms and conditions of the franchise and with any reasonable facility requirements of the manufacturer, and no change is made in the principal management of the new motor vehicle dealership.

To change location of the dealership, or to, during the course of the agreement, make any substantial alterations to the dealership premises, when to do so, would be unreasonable in light of the current economic, political, and social considerations.

To prospectively assent to a release, assignment, novation, waiver, or estoppel which would relieve any person from liability to be imposed by this law, or to require any controversy between a dealer and a manufacturer, distributor, or representative, to be referred to any person other than the duly constituted courts of the Commonwealth or the United States of America, or to the commissioner, if the referral would be binding upon the dealer.

To establish or maintain exclusive facilities, personnel, display space, or signage for a new motor vehicle make or line.

To expand facilities without making available a sufficient supply of new motor vehicles to support the expansion in light of the market and economic conditions.

It shall be a violation of this section for any manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative:

To delay, refuse, or fail to deliver motor vehicles, or vehicle parts or accessories in reasonable quantities relative to the new motor vehicle dealer’s facilities and sales potential in the new motor vehicle dealer’s relevant market area, and within a reasonable time, but in any case no more than sixty (60) days, after receipt of an order from a dealer having a franchise for the retail sale of any new vehicle sold or distributed by the manufacturer or distributor, any new vehicle, parts, or accessories to new vehicles as are covered by the franchise, if the vehicle, parts, or accessories are publicly advertised as being available for delivery or actually being delivered. The delivery to another dealer of a motor vehicle of the same model and similarly equipped as the vehicle ordered by a motor vehicle dealer who has not received delivery thereof, but who had placed his written order for the vehicle prior to the order of the dealer receiving the vehicle, shall be prima facie evidence of a delayed delivery of, or refusal to deliver, a new motor vehicle to a motor vehicle dealer within sixty (60) days, without cause. This section is not violated, however, if the failure is caused by acts or causes beyond the control of the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative.

To refuse to disclose to any new motor vehicle dealer, handling the same line make, the manner and mode of distribution of that line make within the relevant market areas.

To prevent or attempt to prevent a dealer from receiving fair and reasonable compensation for the value of the franchised business. There shall not be a transfer or assignment of the dealer’s franchise without the consent of the manufacturer or distributor, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.

To obtain money, goods, service, or any other benefit from any other person with whom the dealer does business, on account of, or in relation to, the transaction between the dealer and the other person, other than for compensation for services rendered, unless the benefit is promptly accounted for, and transmitted to, the dealer, excluding any entity engaged primarily in providing financing or insurance on motor vehicles.

To increase prices of motor vehicles which the dealer had ordered for private retail customers prior to the dealer’s receipt of the written official price increase notification, a sales contract signed by a private retail consumer shall constitute evidence of each order, provided that the vehicle is in fact delivered to the customer. In the event of manufacturer price reductions, the amount of a reduction received by a dealer shall be passed on to the private retail consumer by the dealer, if the retail price was negotiated on the basis of the previous higher price to the dealer. Price reductions shall apply to all vehicles in the dealer’s inventory which were subject to the price reduction. Price differences applicable to new model or series motor vehicles at the time of the introduction of new models or series shall not be considered a price increase or price decrease. Price changes caused by the following shall not be subject to the provisions of this section:

The addition to a motor vehicle of required or optional equipment pursuant to state or federal law;

Revaluation of the United States dollar, in the case of foreign-make vehicles or components; or

Increased transportation charges due to an increase in the rate charged by common carrier or transporter.

To offer any refunds or other types of inducements to any person for the purchase of new motor vehicles of a certain line make to be sold to the state or any political subdivision thereof, without making the same offer, upon written request, to all other dealers in the same line make within the relevant market area.

To release to any outside party, except under subpoena, any administrative, judicial or arbitration proceedings, or any business, financial, or personal information which may be, from time to time, provided by the dealer to the manufacturer, without the express written consent of the dealer.

To deny any dealer the right of free association with any other dealer for any lawful purpose.

To establish or maintain a relationship, on the part of a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative, where the voting rights exceed a simple majority.

To own, operate, or control any motor vehicle dealership in the Commonwealth; however, this subsection shall not prohibit:

The operation by any manufacturer of a dealership for a temporary period, not to exceed one (1) year, during the transition from one (1) owner to another;

The ownership or control of a dealership by a manufacturer while the dealership is being sold under a bona fide contract or purchase option to the operator of the dealership; or

The ownership, operation, or control of a dealership by a manufacturer if the licensor determines after a hearing at the request of any party, that there is not a dealer who is independent of the manufacturer available in the community or trade area to own and operate the franchise in a manner consistent with the public interest.

To compete without good faith with a new motor vehicle dealer in the same line make, operating under an agreement or franchise from the aforementioned manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative in the relevant market area. A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative shall not, however, be deemed to be competing when operating a dealership, either temporarily for a reasonable period, not to exceed one (1) year, or in a bona fide retail operation which is for sale to any qualified independent person at a fair and reasonable price, or in a bona fide relationship in which an independent person has made a significant investment, subject to loss in the dealership, and can reasonably expect to acquire full ownership of such dealership on reasonable terms and conditions.

To unfairly discriminate among its new motor vehicle dealers with respect to warranty reimbursement or authority granted its new motor vehicle dealers to make warranty adjustment with retail customers.

To fail to give consent to the sale, transfer, or exchange of the franchise to a qualified buyer capable of being licensed as a new motor vehicle dealer in this state; provided that consent may be withheld when in light of other circumstances, granting the consent would be unreasonable.

To fail to be licensed as provided in this chapter, and to maintain a bond in an amount as determined by this chapter.

It shall be unlawful for a manufacturer, either directly or indirectly, or in combination with or through any subsidiary or affiliated entity, to discriminate in favor of one (1) dealer against another dealer holding a franchise for the same line make of motor vehicle by furnishing to only one (1) dealer any of the following:

Any vehicle, part, or other product that is not available to each dealer at the same price, including discounts, rebates, incentives, or other payments or allowances affecting the net price of the product;

Any vehicle, part, or other product that is not made available to each dealer in quantities proportionate to the demand for the vehicle, part, or other product;

Any vehicle, part, or other product that is not made available to each dealer on comparable delivery terms, including time of delivery after placement of an order;

Any promotional or advertising payment or allowance that is not made available to each dealer on proportionally equal terms;

Any opportunity to purchase or lease from the manufacturer the dealer’s facility that is not made available to each dealer on terms proportionate to the respective values of its facilities;

Any personnel training that is not made available to each dealer on proportionally equal terms;

Any inventory or other financing that is not made available to each dealer on proportionally equal terms, except that a manufacturer, subsidiary, or affiliated entity shall not be obligated to make available financing to a dealer who does not meet reasonable credit standards uniformly applied by the manufacturer, subsidiary, or affiliated entity;

Any opportunity to perform work for which the dealer is entitled to be compensated under this chapter that is not made available to each dealer under uniformly applied standards;

Any opportunity to sell products or services distributed by the manufacturer for resale in connection with the line make of the motor vehicle covered by the franchise that is not made available to each dealer on proportionally equal terms;

Any opportunity to establish an additional sales, service, or parts outlet that is not made available to each dealer in whose relevant market area the sales, service, or parts outlet will be located;

Any information concerning the manufacturer’s products, prices or other terms of sale, or promotional programs that is not contemporaneously furnished to the dealer;

Any improvement to, or payment to the dealer for an improvement to, the dealer’s facilities that is not made available to each dealer on proportionally equal terms;

Any opportunity to sell or assign retail installment contracts or consumer leases to the manufacturer or the manufacturer’s sales finance company subsidiary that is not made available to each dealer on proportionally equal terms, except that a manufacturer or sales finance company shall not be obligated to purchase any retail installment contract or consumer lease that does not meet reasonable credit terms uniformly applied by the manufacturer or sales finance company subsidiary;

Any product assistance, service, or facility in connection with the franchise that is not made available to each dealer on proportionally equal terms; or

Any payment for any service or facility in connection with the franchise that is not made available to each dealer on proportionally equal terms.

It shall not be a defense to an alleged violation of subsection (3) of this section, that an item or opportunity was offered to a dealer if the offer was conditioned upon the dealer meeting one (1) or more requirements that are not reasonable and necessary to fulfill the dealer’s obligations under the franchise. The manufacturer shall have the burden of proving that any requirement upon which an offer was conditioned was reasonable and necessary to fulfill the dealer’s obligations under the franchise when the offer was made. A requirement shall not be found to be reasonable and necessary to fulfill the dealer’s obligations under the franchise if the manufacturer cannot prove that it was within the control of each dealer to meet the requirement imposed on the dealer as a condition of the offer.

A dealer who alleges a good faith belief that the dealer has been, or is being, discriminated against in violation of subsection (3) of this section, may demand in writing that the manufacturer furnish the dealer with pertinent information reasonably necessary for the dealer to determine if discrimination exists. If the manufacturer fails to furnish the dealer with the information demanded within thirty (30) days of the manufacturer’s receipt of the dealer’s written demand, the manufacturer shall have, in any subsequent legal proceeding, the burden of proving that the alleged violation has not occurred.

Any dealer who is discriminated against by a manufacturer in violation of subsection (3) of this section shall recover three (3) times an amount equal to the value of what the dealer would have received if the manufacturer had complied with subsection (3) of this section upon furnishing any item or opportunity to another dealer.

A change in ownership of a manufacturer or distributor that contemplates a continuation of that line make in the state shall not directly or indirectly, through actions of any parent of the manufacturer or distributor, subsidiary of the manufacturer or distributor, or common entity cause a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a dealer agreement by a present or previous manufacturer or distributor of an existing agreement unless the manufacturer or distributor offers the new vehicle dealer an agreement substantially similar to that offered to other dealers of the same line make.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 161, § 7, effective May 18, 1956; 1982, ch. 373, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 23, § 6, effective February 22, 2000; 2008, ch. 17, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A manufacturer is prohibited from requiring that a franchise dealer submit to an arbitration panel the question of whether the dealer must pay for all or part of the cost of repairing or replacing a defective new motor vehicle.

OAG 87-69

.

190.071.
Prohibited practices on part of new motor vehicle dealer.

It shall be a violation of this section for any new motor vehicle dealer:

To require the purchaser of a motor vehicle as a condition of sale and delivery, to also purchase special features, appliances, accessories, or equipment not desired or requested by the purchaser, unless the features, appliances, accessories, or equipment are the type which are ordinarily installed on the vehicle by the manufacturer or distributor when the vehicle is received or acquired by the dealer.

To advertise, display, represent, or sell as a new or unused motor vehicle any vehicle which has been operated for demonstration purposes, or which is otherwise a used motor vehicle.

To sell or offer for sale as a new or unused motor vehicle any motor vehicle for which he cannot secure for the purchaser the new car warranty that may be extended by the manufacturer of the vehicle to purchasers of one (1) of its new vehicles, unless the fact that the vehicle being sold without a manufacturer’s warranty is communicated to the purchaser, and disclosed prominently in writing.

To fail to have an established place of business which is used, or will be used, primarily for the purpose of selling, buying, displaying, repairing, or servicing motor vehicles.

To use false or fraudulent representations in connection with the operation of the new motor vehicle dealership.

To fail to reasonably supervise his agents, salesmen, or employees.

To transfer a new motor vehicle with a manufacturer’s statement of origin to a motor vehicle dealer who does not have either a valid service agreement or franchise from the particular line, make, manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative.

Any motor vehicle dealer who fails to comply with this section or the provisions of KRS Chapter 186 or 186A, and any motor vehicle dealer other than a wholesale auto dealer who is found by the commission to have acquired a used motor vehicle for cash, trade-in, or in any other manner and fails to have the registration transferred to him prior to the time the vehicle is sold or otherwise transferred to another person shall be subject to suspension, fine, or revocation of his motor vehicle dealer’s license.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 373, § 14, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 452, § 10, effective July 14, 1992.

190.073.
Regulations.

The commission shall promulgate appropriate and reasonable regulations for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 175, § 18; 1982, ch. 374, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 11, effective July 13, 1984.

190.075.
Restraint of violations.

At the instance of the commission, the department or of any person having any interest in the subject matter, the courts of this state may enjoin any person from violating any of the provisions of this chapter, or any order, rule, regulation or requirement of the commission. The Franklin Circuit Court shall hold concurrent venue with the courts of this Commonwealth of all civil and injunctive actions instituted by the commission for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, or the orders, rules, regulations or requirements properly promulgated under this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 175, § 12; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1982, ch. 374, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 12, effective July 13, 1984.

190.080.
Previous consumer-owner information provided upon request.

As used in this section, “previous consumer-owner” shall mean the last owner of the vehicle who could reasonably be expected to have operated the used car for personal, family, household, or business purposes, but shall not mean an owner who possessed the vehicle primarily for resale purposes.

It shall be unlawful for any motor vehicle dealer or motor vehicle salesperson to refuse to furnish, upon request of a prospective purchaser, the name, address, and telephone number, if known or available, of the previous consumer-owner of any used car offered for sale.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transfer a motor vehicle in order to avoid compliance with this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 161, § 8; 1976, ch. 335, § 1; 2015 ch. 95, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

190.085.
Civic event license plate.

A vehicle which has been donated or loaned by a licensed motor vehicle dealer for use in a civic event may be operated during preparation for and during the civic event with a civic event license plate.

Application for approval of the use of a civic event license plate shall be made to the Department of Vehicle Regulation on forms prescribed and furnished by the department at least sixty (60) days prior to the event. The licensed motor vehicle dealer in his application shall provide the name of the event for which the motor vehicles will be used, date and duration of the event, the number of vehicles to be loaned or donated and other information required by the Department of Vehicle Regulation. The application shall be accompanied by five dollars ($5) for each civic event license plate applied for. The commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall approve or deny the use of the license plate within thirty (30) days after receiving the application and inform the dealer as to his decision.

At least ten (10) days prior to the date approved for the use of civic event license plate, the motor vehicle dealer shall provide to the department the vehicle identification number for each vehicle which is anticipated to be lent or donated to the civic event.

Any motor vehicle bearing a civic event license plate authorized by subsection (1) of this section shall be restricted to use in providing services for events for which approval is granted. The services may include, but not be limited to, parades, transportation of visitors or dignitaries to and from event activities, use by event personnel or event volunteers and any other activity for which a vehicle may be required in the furtherance of the civic event.

The use of the civic event license plate shall be limited to the time set forth in the approved application. A copy of the approved application shall be carried in the vehicle at all times. When the civic event license plate expires, the dealer shall remove the plate and return it to the Department of Vehicle Regulation. The vehicle shall then be registered in a manner required by KRS Chapter 186. A misuse of civic event license plates shall be deemed a violation of the motor vehicle dealer’s license.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation may promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 300, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.